src/fst/phonology.twolc
! -ne, -s word e deletion 
"do not add e for inflecting some forms of ne/s word "

E1:0  <=> :Vowel Null* (») :s Null* _ Null* s e ;          ! olulisse (haplology)
          :Vowel Null* (») :s Null* _ Null* t WordEnd ;   ! soolast, 3-litist
          :Vowel Null* (») :s Null* _ Null* t e ;        ! soolaste, 3-litiste
          :Vowel Null* (») :s Null* _ Null* » l i k ;        ! vaatluslik
                       (») :s Null* _ Null* » u s ;        ! soolasus
                                    _ Null* » %- ;        ! nais-, vaatamis-, astraal-

! lexical: o l u l i n e E1 > s e 
! surface: o l u l i s 0  0 > s e
! lexical: s o o l a n e E1 > t
! surface: s o o l a s 0  0 > t
! lexical: g l o o b u s E1 > t 
! surface: g l o o b u s  0 > t
! lexical: g l o o b u s E1 > t e
! surface: g l o o b u s  0 > t e
! lexical: g l o o b u s E1 > t a
! surface: g l o o b u s  e > t a
! lexical: r a u d n e E1 > t    ! NB! no e deletion
! surface: r a u d s 0  e > t

! lexical: v i s k o o s n e E1 » u s  
! surface: v i s k o o s s 0  0 » u s
! lexical: v i s k o o s n e E1 > t  ! NB! no e deletion
! surface: v i s k o o s s 0 e  > t

!!€ viskoosneE1>t
!!€ viskooss0e>t

!!$ viskoosneE1>t
!!$ viskooss00>t


! i is a vowel that starts Pl Par or vowel plural affixes; or -im derivation Der/im 
! use I1 as a trigger
"I1 triggers -ne to be -s"

I1:i   => n:s e:0 Null* (») _ ;   ! -ne word
          s Null* _ ;       ! -s word

! lexical: k a t k i n e > I1
! surface: k a t k i s 0 >  i
! lexical: g l o o b u s > I1
! surface: g l o o b u s >  i

! ----
! ---- stem + affix consonant cluster  
! ----

! ---- stem final consonant changes

! a general rule, but has to be encoded with M1 to allow for komtuur, EMT etc
"m pronounced as n before t"

M1:n  <=> _ Null* [:t | :d ] ;

! lexical: l e e M1 {stemill} {rare} > t
! surface: l e e  n      0        0  > t 

! ---- stem final consonant disappears 

"s g d disappear in front of dt: only 0 allowed"

Cx:0  =>  _ NullNoWeakTrigger* [ :t | :d ] ;
     where Cx in (K1 D1 S1 ) ;

"s g d disappear in front of dt: no surface phone allowed"

Cx:Cy /<=  _ NullNoWeakTrigger* [ :t | :d ] ;
     where Cx in (K1 D1 S1 ) 
           Cy in ( k  d  s )
     matched ;

! lexical: a n D1 > T7 u d
! surface: a n  0 >  t u d
! lexical: p u s K1 > T7 u d
! surface: p u s  0 >  t u d
! lexical: v a r S1 {stemill} {S} > d e > {s} {s} {e}
! surface: v a r  0      0     0  > d e >  0   0   0
! lexical: k o l m a N1 S1 d a
! surface: k o l m a  n  0 d a

! --------- affix allomorph changes because of the final phone of the stem

! noun pl affix te -> de; 
! thus tütar, kannel, pinge, kotkas appear similar

"+te appears as +de in tütar-type words"
 t:d <=> [A2:a | E2:e] lmnr %{W%}: %> _ e ; 

! lexical: s ´ õ s t A2 r {W} > t e
! surface: s 0 õ s t  a r  0  > d e

! similar to imperative mood affixes
! default: D7:d
! lexical: s i p 0 l e {W} > D7 a
! surface: s i p e l 0  0  >  d a

! default for infinitive and gerund affixes is D7:d

"infinitive and gerund affixes may begin in t"

D7:t  <=> :Vowel Null* %{W%}: SuffixBorder _ ;

! lexical: h ü p p a {W} > D7 a
! surface: h ü p 0 a {W} >  t a

"infinitive and gerund affixes may assimilate to 0"

D7:0  <=>  [:p | :t | :d] Null* SuffixBorder _ ; ! tappa, kasta, nutta, anda, niita, nõuda, ... 

! lexical: k ü T1 t > D7 a 
! surface: k ü  t t >  0 a
! lexical: k e e T2 > D7 a 
! surface: k e e  t >  0 a
! lexical: k ü n D1 > D7 a
! surface: k ü n  d >  0 a

"impersonal voice affix may begin in d"

T7:d  <=> [l | n | r] e:0 %{W%}: SuffixBorder _ ;
          [l | n | r] [A7:0 | E7:0] SuffixBorder _ ;

! lexical: s i p 0 l e {W} > T7 u d
! surface: s i p e l 0  0  >  d u d
! lexical: n a e r A7 > T7 u d
! surface: n a e r  0 >  d u d

! default: T7:t
!
! lexical: e l a > T7 a k s e
! surface: e l a >  t a k s e
! lexical: l e p p i {W} > T7 a k s e
! surface: l e p 0 i  0  >  t a k s e
! lexical: s e i s > T7 a k s e
! surface: s e i s >  t a k s e
! lexical: a n D1 > T7 a k s e
! surface: a n  0 >  t a k s e
! lexical: j o o K1 s {W} > T7 a k s e
! surface: j o o  0 s  0  >  t a k s e

"imperative mood affix may begin in k"

G7:k  <=> [\:Vowel | :i] a Null* %{W%}: %> _ ;

! lexical: h ü p p a {W} > G7 u
! surface: h ü p 0 a {W} >  k u
! lexical: l õ u G1 a {W} > G7 u
! surface: l õ u  0 a {W} >  k u
! lexical: l a i a {W} > G7 u
! surface: l a i a {W} >  k u

"-gu only -u after k: no surface phone allowed"
G7:Cx  /<=   :k Null* _ ;   ! only laskma mõskma puskma
     where Cx in (k g) ;

"-gu only -u after k: only 0 allowed"
G7:0  =>   :k Null* _ ;     ! only laskma mõskma puskma

! lexical: p u s K1 > G7 u
! surface: p u s  k >  0 u

"from -ssi to -si"
S7:0 <=>  :s Null* _ ;    ! to eliminate jookssid, seissid

! lexical: j o o K1 s > I7 S7 i d
! surface: j o o  k s >  0  0 i d

! ------ add a vowel to make the word form pronouncable 

"from -v to -ev"

0:e <=> :Consonant Null* SuffixBorder _ v Null* WordEnd ;

! lexical: n ´ a e r > 0 v
! surface: n ´ a e r > e v

! impersonal voice for söötma, nutma, lõpma: söödetud, nutetud, lõpetud
"from t+t to te+t"

0:e <=> [t: | T1: | p:] Null* _ %{W%}: SuffixBorder T7:t ;

! lexical: n ´ u t t A7 0 {W} > T7 u d
! surface: n ´ u t 0  0 e  0  >  t u d

! add i to make s-ending preteritum form pronouncable,

"i surfaces in preteritum"

I7:i <=> :Consonant Null* %> _ S7: WordEnd ;

! lexical: n ´ a e r > I7 S7
! surface: n ´ a e r >  i  s
! lexical: s e i s > I7 S7
! surface: s e i s >  i  s          NB! S7:s

! -----
! ----- stem + affix vowel cluster
! -----

! ----- stem final phone changes

"i lowers to e before inflectional i"

i:e  <=>  [ :Consonant | %{apo%}:' ] Null* _ Null* %> :i ;
      
! lexical: v o o d i > i d
! surface: v o o d e > i d
! lexical: r u k K1 i > i d
! surface: r u k  k e > i d
! lexical: S c h e d u l e {apo} i > i d
! surface: S c h e d u l e   '   e > i d

! stem ends with a long rounded vowel 
! and the inflectional affix starts with a vowel
! (6 old words löö, söö, joo, loo, too, poo)

"Verb vowel ö o to õ"

Vx:õ  <=> Vx: _ Null+ :i ; 
     where Vx in ( Ö6 O6 ) ; 

"Verb vowel ö o to 0"

Vx:0  <=> _ Vx:õ Null+ :i ; 
     where Vx in ( Ö6 O6 ) ; 

! lexical: l O6 O6 > i 
! surface: l  0  õ > i 

"Verb vowel o ö to u ü"

Vx:Vy  <=>  Vx: _  Null+ [:a | :e] ; 
             _ :Vy Null+ [:a | :e] ;
     where Vx in ( Ö6 O6 ) 
           Vy in ( ü  u )
     matched ;

! lexical: l O6 O6 {W} > T7 a k s e 
! surface: l u   u  0  >  0 a k s e 


! us-suffix and ini-suffix attach to a consonant, so a preceding vowel is deleted
! in reality, only a u e are the preceding vowels

! ----- stem final phone disappears

"delete vowel before -us -is or -ini"

Vx:0 <=> :Consonant Null* _ SuffixBorder u s ;
         :Consonant Null* _ SuffixBorder i s ;
         :Consonant Null* _ SuffixBorder i n i ;
     where Vx in ( a u e A1) ; 

! lexical: a h h e t a » u s
! surface: a h h e t 0 » u s
! lexical: p i n g n e > A1 » u s
! surface: p i n g s 0 >  0 » u s
! lexical: a r v e l d a » i s
! surface: a r v e l d 0 » i s

! -----
! ----- 
! -----

! ---------
! Rules for selecting 
! 1. the inflectional affix and 
! 2. its usage info 
! for inflectional types where alternative affixes are common, 
! but depend on the frequency of individual words.
! The alternatives themselves are encoded in continuation lexicons, but the triggers for
! selecting the correct variant for the word are encoded in the stem lexicon entries.
! The affixes concerned are:
! 1. plural partitive: 1.1. -sid vs stem vowel change; 1.2. -sid vs -id
! 2. singular illative: -sse vs stem grade strengthening; 
! ---------

!! 1.1. plural partitive: -sid vs stem vowel change
!
! PIIM, KOON, EIT > PL_PAR
! pl part kingi/kingasid, koone/koonusid etc
! co-play of several rules with stem lex and contin. lex info for plural partitive:
! 1. generate correct plural forms
!    - -sid is always possible
!    - vowel is possible only when shown in stem lex
! 2. add usage info (rare, hyp) for the generated forms
!    - if stem lex shows vowel without usage tag, then -sid form is rare
!    - if stem lex has usage tag (rare, hyp) after vowel, then this form is rare or hyp
! note the use of %{rare%} (Lexicon-based usage Tag) in rules

! ---------
! affixes sid, id and sse have to be unnaturally described symbol-by-symbol

! affixes sid, sse, id

"i for sid"
%{i%}:i        <=>  :s _ :d ;

"d for sid"
%{d%}:d        <=>  :s :i _ ;

"s for sse, sid"
%{s%}:s         =>  :s _ :e ;   ! sse
                    _ :s :e ;   ! sse
                    _ :i :d ;   ! sid

"e for sse"
%{e%}:e        <=>   :s :s _ ;

! rules for choosing the shorter wordform depend on info in the lexical entry
"choosing short(er) affix: 0 vs sid, 0 vs sse, id vs sid"

%{s%}:0     =>  PlSV:stemV   Any* _ %{i%}:0 %{d%}:0; ! short Pl Par needs its stem vowel indicated in the lexicon
                %{id%}:      Any* _ i d ;            ! -id needs a trigger in the lexicon
                %{stemill%}: Any* _ %{s%}:0 %{e%}:0; ! stem (aka short) illative needs a trigger in the lexicon
                                  %{s%}:0 _ %{e%}:0; ! the middle s is sometimes zero, of course  

! lexical: s a b a > {pl.u} {rare} {stemill} > {s} {i} {d} 
! surface: s a b 0 >    u      0       0     >  0   0   0 
! lexical: p u u {id} > {s} i d 
! surface: p u 0  0   > 0  i d 
! lexical: s a b . a > {pl.u} {rare} {stemill} {S} > {s} {s} {e} 
! surface: s a p p a >    0      0       0      0  >  0   0   0 

! the contexts in this rule are fragile, because a word may contain some special characters
! somewhere in the stem...
"non-third grade word cannot be stem illative"

%{s%}:0  /<= ShortSyll :Consonant Null* :Vowel SuffixBorder* Null* SuffixBorder _ %{s%}:0 %{e%}:0 ;

! p e r e {stemill} {S} > {s} {s} {e}
! p e r e     0      0  >  0   0   0   FAIL
! m a j a > {pl.u} {stemill} {S} > {s} {s} {e}
! m a j a >    0       0      0  >  0   0   0   FAIL

! this is only for pea, soo, suu, öö
! ... and for Riia - Riiga, Rannu - Randu etc
"in stem illative, the lexical morphophoneme cannot be in its weak form"

%{s%}:0  /<= [H3:0 | D3:0 | G3:0 | G4:g | B4:b | D4:d] Any* _ %{s%}:0 %{e%}:0 ;
             
! s o o H3 Y3 > {id} {stemill} {S} > {s} {s} {e}
! s o o  0  0 >   0     0       0  >  0   0   0  FAIL
! R i i G3 a {stemill} {S} > {s} {s} {e}
! R i i  0 a    0       0  >  0   0   0  FAIL
! A b j a {stemill} {S} > {s} {s} {e} 
! A b j a     0      0  >  0   0   0   FAIL 

"No sg stem vowel if no Pl Par with -sid (choose pl stem vowel instead)"

Vx:0  <=>  %> PlSV:stemV Null* _ Null* %{s%}:0 %{i%}:0 ;
     where Vx in ( %{sg.a%} %{sg.e%} %{sg.u%} %{sg.i%} ); 

"Choose pl stem vowel for Pl Par (sg stem vowel is 0) "

Vx:Vy  <=>  :Consonant Null* %> _ Null+ %{s%}:0 %{i%}:0 ;     ! puud-puudi, maja - maju
                     i Null* %> _ Null+ %{s%}:0 %{i%}:0 ;     ! sai - saiu
     where Vx in ( %{pl.e%} %{pl.i%} %{pl.u%} ) 
           Vy in (     e        i        u   )
     matched ;

! lexical: k i n g > {pl.i}       {sg.a} > {s} {i} {d}
! surface: k i n g >    i            0   >  0   0   0  
! lexical: p u u d > {pl.i} {hyp} {sg.a} > {s} {i} {d} {rare}
! surface: p u u d >    i     0      0   >  0   0   0     0 
! lexical: k a u p > {pl.u}       {sg.a} > {s} {i} {d}  
! surface: k a u p >    u            0   >  0   0   0
! lexical: m a j a > {pl.u}        {stemill} > {s} {i} {d} 
! surface: m a j 0 >    u             0      >  0   0   0    
! lexical: s a b a > {pl.u} {rare} {stemill} > {s} {i} {d} {rare}
! surface: s a b 0 >    u     0        0     >  0   0   0     0 


! ------------

! maja-maju/majasid, osa-osi/osasid, nuga-nuge/nugasid
! if vowel plural partitive is possible, then it has to be indicated in stem lexicon
! concerns only words ending with -a, and huvi, kivi, kruvi 

"vowel deletion before plural vowel"
